California statutes. Vehicle Code
Whenever after a judgment is satisfied and proof of financial responsibility is given, another judgment is rendered against the same person for any accident occurring prior to the date of the giving of the proof and the person fails to satisfy the latter judgment within the amounts specified in this chapter within 15 days after the latter judgment became final, then the department shall again suspend the driver’s license of the judgment debtor and shall not issue to him or her any driver’s license while the latter judgment remains unsatisfied and subsisting within the amounts specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

16375.

Any person whose driver’s license has been suspended, or is about to be suspended or shall become subject to suspension under this chapter, may relieve himself from the effect of the judgment by filing with the department an affidavit stating that at the time of the accident upon which the judgment has been rendered he was insured, that the insurer is liable to pay such judgment, and the reason, if known, why the insurance company has not paid the judgment. He shall also file the original policy of insurance or a certified copy thereof, if available, and such other documents as the department may require to show that the loss, injury, or damage for which the judgment was rendered, was covered by the policy of insurance.

If the department is satisfied from such papers that the insurer was authorized to issue the policy of insurance in this state at the time of issuing the policy and that such insurer is liable to pay such judgment, at least to the extent and for the amounts provided in this chapter, the department shall not suspend the license, or if already suspended, shall reinstate it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 714.)
-------------------------------------------

16376.

(a) If the person against whom judgment is rendered is a nonresident and the person fails within the prescribed time to satisfy the judgment in full or to the extent specified in this chapter, all privileges of operating a motor vehicle in this state given to the person under this code shall be suspended while the judgment remains in effect and unsatisfied and until the nonresident gives proof of his or her financial responsibility in the manner and to the extent provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430) for accidents occurring after the date of the giving of proof.

(b) The department shall forward a certified copy of the judgment of a court of record to the appropriate officer in charge of the licensing of drivers in the state of which the person is a resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16377.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, every judgment shall be deemed satisfied if any of the following apply:

(1) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) has been credited, upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, which together total in excess of that amount, for personal injury to, or death of, one person as a result of any one accident.

(2) Subject to the limit of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) as to one person, the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) has been credited, upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, which together total in excess of that amount, for personal injury to, or death of, more than one person as
 a result of any one accident.

(3) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) has been credited, upon any judgment in excess of that amount, or upon all judgments, collectively, each of which is in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), and which together total in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident.

(4) The judgment debtor or a person designated by him or her has deposited with the department a sum equal to the amount of the unsatisfied judgment for which the suspension action was taken and presents proof, satisfactory to the department, of inability to locate the judgment creditor.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 301.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16378.

(a) Money deposited pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16377 shall be:

(1) Deposited by the department in the special deposit fund with the Treasurer.

(2) Payable to the judgment creditor upon presentation of a valid claim establishing that he or she is the judgment creditor for which the deposit was made and that the judgment remains unsatisfied.

(3) Refunded to the person making the deposit or to a person designated by himself or herself if the deposit remains unclaimed by the judgment creditor for a period of two years following the
 date of the deposit.

(4) The Controller shall draw his or her warrant on the Treasurer for any payment ordered pursuant to this section as ordered by the department.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 40) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 41.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16379.

(a) The department shall not suspend a license and shall restore any suspended license following nonpayment of a final judgment when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility for future damages and when the trial court in which the judgment was rendered orders the payment of the judgment in installments and while the payment of any installment payment is not in default.

(b) Whenever the trial court orders the payment of a judgment in installments as provided in this section, upon payment of the required fees by the judgment creditor, it shall forward a certified copy of the order to the department, together with a certified copy of the judgment or a certified copy of the register of actions in an action resulting in a judgment for damages and a certificate of facts relative to the judgment on a form provided by the department.

(c) The court shall determine the required fees, which shall be commensurate with the cost incurred by the court in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 44, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

16380.

The trial court may order the payment of a judgment in installments only when the defendant is not insured or the insurance policy covering the automobile involved in the accident, for the ownership or operation of which the defendant is held liable, is not sufficient to pay the amount of the judgment, and then only as to such portion of the judgment not covered by the insurance policy. The order shall fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments and shall be without prejudice to any other legal remedies available to the judgment creditor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16486 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

16381.

In the event that it is made to appear to the court that the judgment debtor has failed to pay any installment as permitted by the order of the court, upon the payment of required fees by the judgment creditor, the court shall give notice of the default to the department and the department shall forthwith suspend the driving privilege of the judgment debtor until the judgment is satisfied as provided in this chapter. The court shall determine the required fees, which shall be commensurate with the cost incurred by the court in carrying out the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 362, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Proof of Financial Responsibility [16430. - 16484.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proof Requirements [16430. - 16436.]

16430.

(a) “Proof of financial responsibility,” when required by this code, means proof of financial responsibility resulting from the ownership or operation of a motor vehicle and arising by reason of personal injury to, or death of, any one person, of at least thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), and, subject to the limit of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each person injured or killed, of at least sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for the injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one accident, and for damages to property in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) resulting from any one accident. Proof of financial responsibility may be given in any manner authorized in this chapter.

(b) (1) On January 1, 2035, the minimum liability coverage shall be increased by twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for bodily injury or death for each person, by forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for bodily injury or death for all persons, and by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for property damage.

(2) The Insurance Commissioner shall, by July 1, 2033, distribute a bulletin soliciting rate applications from insurers to effectuate the January 1, 2035, increase and shall process and approve them consistent with the manner outlined in Section 12960 of the Insurance Code.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 5.   (SB 1107)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16431.

(a) Proof of financial responsibility may be given by the written certificate or certificates of any insurance carrier duly authorized to do business within the state, that it has issued to or for the benefit of the person named therein a motor vehicle liability policy as defined in Section 16450, an automobile liability policy as defined in Section 16054, or any other liability policy issued for vehicles with less than four wheels that meets the requirements of Section 16056, which, at the date of the certificate or certificates, is in full force and effect. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the certificate or certificates issued under any liability policy set forth in this section shall be accepted by the department and satisfy the requirements of proof of financial responsibility of this chapter. Nothing in this chapter requires that an insurance carrier certify that there is coverage broader than that provided by the actual policy issued by the carrier.

(b) The department shall require that a person whose driver’s license has been revoked, suspended, or restricted under Section 13350, 13351, 13352, 13353, 13353.2, 13353.3, 13353.7, or 16370, provide, as proof of financial responsibility, a certificate or certificates that covers all motor vehicles registered to the person before reinstatement of his or her driver’s license.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply to vehicles in storage if the current license plates and registration cards are surrendered to the department in Sacramento.

(d) (1) A resident of another state may provide proof of financial responsibility when required to do so under this code from a company authorized to do business in that person’s state of residence, if that proof is satisfactory to the department, covers the operation of a vehicle in this state, and meets the minimum coverage limit requirements specified in Section 16056.

(2) If the person specified in paragraph (1) becomes a resident of this state during the period that the person is required to maintain proof of financial responsibility with the department, the department may not issue or return a driver’s license to that person until the person files a written certificate or certificates, as authorized under subdivision (a), that meets the minimum coverage limit requirements specified in Section 16056 and covers the period during which the person is required to maintain proof of financial responsibility.

(e) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (e).)
-------------------------------------------

16433.

A certificate or certificates shall certify, if the liability policy therein cited has been canceled, that the department shall be notified in writing within 10 days after the cancellation of insurance becomes final.

Nothing in this section extends coverage beyond the date stated in the notice of cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 314, Sec. 8.   Effective July 17, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16434.

(a) Proof of financial responsibility may be given by a bond. The bond shall be conditioned for the payment of the amount specified in Section 16430, and shall provide for the entry of judgment on motion of the state in favor of any holder of any final judgment on account of damages to property over one thousand dollars ($1,000) in amount, or injury to any person caused by the operation of the person’s motor vehicle.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 44) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 45.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16435.

(a) Proof of financial responsibility may be given by the deposit of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) as provided in Section 16054.2. The department shall not accept a deposit where any judgment theretofore obtained against that person as a result of damages arising from the operation of any motor vehicle shall not have been paid in full.

(b) The deposit requirement in subdivision (a) shall be increased by fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) on January 1, 2035.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 7.   (SB 1107)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16436.

Proof of financial responsibility may be given by the written certificate of a self-insurer holding a certificate of self-insurance for bodily injury and property damage issued by the department.

The certification shall name the employee in whose behalf it is filed and shall bind the self-insurer in a like manner and to the same amounts as provided for in Section 16430 for damages arising from the operation of a motor vehicle by the employee within the scope of his or her employment by the self-insurer. In that case, the department shall restrict any driver’s license issued to the employee to the operation of motor vehicles owned by the self-insurer within the scope of his or her employment by the self-insurer.

The certificate shall be canceled upon 10 days’ prior written notice to the department by the self-insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Insurance Policy [16450. - 16457.]

16450.

A “motor vehicle liability policy,” as used in Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 16000), 2 (commencing with Section 16250), and 4 (commencing with Section 16500), and this chapter, means an owner’s policy or an operator’s policy, or both, of liability insurance, certified as provided in Section 16431 as proof of financial responsibility, issued by an insurance carrier authorized to transact that business in this state to or for the benefit of the person named therein as assured. Any requirements set forth in Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 16000), 2 (commencing with Section 16250), and 4 (commencing with Section 16500), and this chapter relating to a motor vehicle liability policy shall apply only to those policies which have been certified as proof of financial responsibility as provided in Section 16431.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

16451.

(a) (1) An owner’s policy of motor vehicle liability insurance shall insure the named insured and any other person using any motor vehicle registered to the named insured with the express or implied permission of the named insured against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle within the continental limits of the United States to the extent and aggregate amount, exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each motor vehicle, of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for bodily injury to or death of each person as a result of any one accident, and, subject to the limit as to one person, the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for bodily
 injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident and the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an owner’s policy of motor vehicle liability insurance issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, shall insure the named insured and any other person using any motor vehicle registered to the named insured with the express or implied permission of the named insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle within the continental limits of the United States to the extent and aggregate amount, exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each motor vehicle, of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for bodily injury to or death of each
 person as a result of any one accident, and, subject to the limit as to one person, the amount of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for bodily injury to or death of all persons as a result of any one accident and the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident.

(b) For an owner’s policy of motor vehicle liability insurance issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2035, the minimum liability coverage shall be increased by twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for bodily injury or death for one person, by forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for bodily injury or death for all persons, and by ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for property damage.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 9) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 20.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16452.

An operator’s policy of motor vehicle liability insurance shall insure the person named as insured therein against loss from the liability imposed on that person by law for damages arising out of use by that person of any motor vehicle not owned by that person, and for any subsequently acquired motor vehicle for a period not to exceed 10 days from date of purchase, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are provided for in an owner’s policy of liability insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

16453.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage herein specified or contain any agreements, provisions or stipulations not in conflict with the provisions of this code and not otherwise contrary to law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16454.

Any motor vehicle liability policy need not cover any liability for injury to the assured or any liability of the assured assumed by or imposed upon the assured under any workers’ compensation law nor any liability for damage to property in charge of the assured or the assured’s employees or agents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------

16455.

The provisions of Section 16451 shall not apply to vehicles in storage if the current license plates and registration cards are surrendered to the department in Sacramento.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

16457.

Whenever proof of financial responsibility is required to be filed pursuant to this chapter, no person of whom that proof is required shall drive any motor vehicle not covered by the certificate of proof of financial responsibility filed by him or her with the department, nor shall any applicant for that proof knowingly fail to disclose ownership of a motor vehicle in the application for proof of financial responsibility or to disclose any subsequently acquired motor vehicle.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1126, Sec. 14) by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Release of Proof [16480. - 16484.]

16480.

(a) The department shall upon request, or may at its own discretion, cancel any bond or any certificate of insurance, or the department shall direct the return to the person entitled thereto of any money or securities deposited pursuant to this code as proof of financial responsibility, or the department shall waive the requirement of filing proof of financial responsibility in any of the following events:

(1) When the person is no longer required to maintain the proof under the provisions of this code.

(2) At any time after three years from the date the proof was required.

(3) Upon the death of the person on whose behalf the proof was filed.

(4) The permanent incapacity of the person to operate a motor vehicle if the person surrenders for cancellation his or her driver’s license to the department. 

(b) The department shall not release proof filed by the bond of individual sureties as set forth in Section 16434, or if given in the manner prescribed by Section 16435, if any action for damages upon a liability referred to in this code is then pending or if any judgment upon any the liability is outstanding and unsatisfied. An affidavit of the applicant of the nonexistence of those facts shall be prima facie evidence thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

16482.

(a) Any person whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended because of failure to satisfy a judgment and the judgment has been outstanding for a period of three years or more, may be relieved of the penalties therein provided and the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle may be restored in the event the person files with the department and thereafter maintains proof of financial responsibility notwithstanding that the judgment which gave rise to the order of suspension has not been paid or fully satisfied.

(b) Any person who has filed proof of financial responsibility as required for three years, or who has been eligible to file that proof for three years, may be relieved of the requirement of filing proof as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16480.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

16483.

The department shall cancel any bond or any certificate of insurance or direct the return of any money or securities to the person entitled thereto, upon the substitution and acceptance of other adequate proof of financial responsibility pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

16484.

Except when a nonresident minor’s certificate or minor’s license is canceled as required by Sections 12504 and 17704, respectively, whenever any evidence of proof of financial responsibility filed by any person under the provisions of this code no longer fulfills the purpose for which required, the department shall require other evidence of financial responsibility as required by Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) and shall suspend the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle upon a highway. The suspension shall remain in effect until adequate proof of financial responsibility is filed with the department by the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Commercial Vehicles [16500. - 16503.]

16500.

(a) (1) Every owner of a vehicle used in the transportation of passengers for hire, including taxicabs, when the operation of the vehicle is not subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission, shall maintain, whenever the owner may be engaged in conducting those operations, either of the following:

(A) Proof of financial responsibility resulting from the ownership or operation of the vehicle and arising by reason of personal injury to, or death of, any one person, of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), and, subject to the limit of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each person injured or killed, of at least thirty thousand dollars
 ($30,000) for the injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one accident, and for damages to property of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) resulting from any one accident.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), proof of financial responsibility resulting from the ownership or operation of the vehicle and arising by reason of personal injury to, or death of, any one person, of at least thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), and, subject to the limit of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each person injured or killed, of at least sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for the injury to, or the death of, two or more persons in any one accident, and for damages to property of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) resulting from any one accident.

(ii) The proof of financial responsibility limits required by clause (i) shall apply to a motor vehicle liability policy, described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), or bond, described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2025.

(2) Proof of financial responsibility may be maintained by any of the following:

(A) Being insured under a motor vehicle liability policy against that liability.

(B) Obtaining a bond of the same kind, and containing the same provisions, as those bonds specified in Section 16434.

(C) By depositing with the department seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), which shall be
 deposited in a special deposit account with the Controller for the purpose of this section.

(D) Qualifying as a self-insurer under Section 16053.

(b) The department shall return the deposit to the person entitled thereto when the person is no longer required to maintain proof of financial responsibility as required by this section or upon the person’s death.

(c) On January 1, 2035, each of the following shall occur:

(1) The minimum liability coverage shall be increased by twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for bodily injury or death for one person, by forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for bodily injury or death for all persons, and by ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
 for property damage.

(2) The minimum liability coverage required by paragraph (1) shall apply to a motor vehicle liability policy, described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), or bond, described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2035.

(3) The deposit requirement in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be increased by fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 21.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16500.5.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), the owner of the following commercial vehicles shall maintain proof of financial responsibility in the amount required by the director:

(1) A vehicle used to carry passengers for hire, except taxicabs as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 27908.

(2) A vehicle having an unladen weight of over 7,000 pounds which is used in the transportation of property in the conduct of a business.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the following vehicles:

(1) A schoolbus.

(2) A motor vehicle used by a farmer exclusively in the transportation of his or her livestock, implements of husbandry, and agricultural commodities or in the transportation of supplies to his or her farm.

(3) A motor vehicle used by a resident farmer of this state to occasionally transport from the place of production to a warehouse, regular market, place of storage, or place of shipment the farm products of neighboring farmers in exchange for like services, farm products, or other compensation.

(4) A vehicle used in for-hire transportation which is subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission.

(5) A rented vehicle used for noncommercial transportation of property.

(c) The director shall establish the amounts which are determined adequate to cover damages resulting from the ownership or operation of a commercial vehicle or vehicles subject to this section arising by reason of personal injury to, or death of, any person or damage to property, or both. The director shall establish the amounts at levels equal to those prescribed by the Public Utilities Commission for owners and operators of for-hire vehicles subject to its jurisdiction and control.

(d) Proof of financial responsibility may be maintained by any of the following:

(1) Being insured under one or more motor vehicle liability policies against that liability.

(2) Obtaining a bond of the same kind, and containing the same provisions, as those bonds specified in Section 16434.

(3) By depositing with the department five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), which amount shall be deposited in a special deposit account with the Controller for the purpose of this section.

(4) Qualifying as a self-insurer under Section 16053.

(e) The department shall return the deposit made pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) to the person entitled thereto when the owner is no longer required to maintain proof of financial responsibility as required by this section or upon the owner’s death.

(f) An insurer, agent, or broker who has been incorrectly informed by an owner of a vehicle or his or her representative that the vehicle is 7,000 pounds or less unladen weight, or is incorrectly informed by the owner or his or her representative that the vehicle is exempt from the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (c) pursuant to the exemptions set forth in subdivision (b), may issue a policy of motor vehicle liability insurance in any amount less than that required by the director but not less than the amounts required under Section 16451. The policy of motor vehicle liability insurance when issued shall not be deemed to provide liability coverage amounts greater than that specifically set forth in the policy notwithstanding that the vehicle weighs in excess of 7,000 pounds unladen weight or is subsequently used in a manner which would have required the vehicle to be insured in the amounts established by the director pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.

The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent local authorities, within the reasonable exercise of the police power, from adopting rules and regulations, by ordinance or resolution, licensing and regulating the operation of any vehicle for hire and the drivers of passenger vehicles for hire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1554.)
-------------------------------------------

16502.

(a) An owner shall not use, or with his or her consent permit the use of, a vehicle used in the transportation of persons or property in the conduct of a business, without maintaining proof of financial responsibility as required by this chapter.

(b) A motor vehicle from another country in which there is no evidence of financial responsibility required pursuant to this chapter or Part 387 (commencing with Section 387.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be denied entry into the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 288, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16503.

The department shall suspend the registration of all vehicles used in the transportation of persons or property in the conduct of a business, except vehicles subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission, which are registered in the name of any person convicted of violating Section 16502 immediately upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of the court in which the person was convicted.

The suspension shall remain in effect and no such vehicle shall be registered in the name of the person until he or she gives the department proof of his or her financial responsibility as required by Section 16500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1157, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Interstate Highway Carriers [16560. - 16560.]

16560.

(a) Any person or corporation who operates or causes to be operated on the highways of this state any motor vehicle in the interstate or foreign transportation of property, other than household goods, for compensation without having first complied with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 7232 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person or corporation who operates or causes to be operated on the highways of
 this state any motor vehicle in the interstate or foreign transportation of household goods for compensation without having first complied with the requirements of Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code or passengers for compensation without having first complied with the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3901) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than three months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 15.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. CIVIL LIABILITY [17000. - 17714.]



CHAPTER 1. Civil Liability of Owners and Operators of Vehicles [17000. - 17463.]



  ARTICLE 1. Public Agencies [17000. - 17004.7.]

17000.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Employee” includes an officer, employee, or servant, whether or not compensated, but does not include an independent contractor.

(b) “Employment” includes office or employment.

(c) “Public entity” includes the state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

A public entity is liable for death or injury to person or property proximately caused by a negligent or wrongful act or omission in the operation of any motor vehicle by an employee of the public entity acting within the scope of his employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.

Subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 825) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, a public entity is liable for death or injury to person or property to the same extent as a private person under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 17150) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.

A public employee is not liable for civil damages on account of personal injury to or death of any person or damage to property resulting from the operation, in the line of duty, of an authorized emergency vehicle while responding to an emergency call or when in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, or when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm or other emergency call.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1527.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.5.

Any private firm or corporation, or employee thereof, which maintains a fire department and has entered into a mutual aid agreement pursuant to Section 13855, 14095, or 14455.5 of the Health and Safety Code shall have the same immunity from liability for civil damages on account of personal injury to or death of any person or damage to property resulting from the operation of an authorized emergency vehicle while responding to, but not upon returning from, a fire alarm or other emergency call as is provided by law for the district and its employees with which the firm or corporation has entered into a mutual aid agreement, except when the act or omission causing the personal injury to or death of any person or damage to property occurs on property under the control of such firm or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1880, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.7.

(a) The immunity provided by this section is in addition to any other immunity provided by law. The adoption of a vehicle pursuit policy by a public agency pursuant to this section is discretionary.

(b) (1) A public agency employing peace officers that adopts and promulgates a written policy on, and provides regular and periodic training on an annual basis for, vehicular pursuits complying with subdivisions (c) and (d) is immune from liability for civil damages for personal injury to or death of any person or damage to property resulting from the collision of a vehicle being operated by an actual or suspected violator of the law who is being, has been, or believes he or she is being or has been, pursued in a motor vehicle by a peace officer employed by the public entity.

(2) Promulgation of the written policy under paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, a requirement that all peace officers of the public agency certify in writing that they have received, read, and understand the policy. The failure of an individual officer to sign a certification shall not be used to impose liability on an individual officer or a public entity.

(c) A policy for the safe conduct of motor vehicle pursuits by peace officers shall meet all of the following minimum standards:

(1) Determine under what circumstances to initiate a pursuit. The policy shall define a “pursuit,” articulate the reasons for which a pursuit is authorized, and identify the issues that should be considered in reaching the decision to pursue. It should also address the importance of protecting the public and balancing the known or reasonably suspected offense, and the apparent need for immediate capture against the risks to peace officers, innocent motorists, and others to protect the public.
